Massachusetts, session 194th, S3048.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, are hereby amended by
inserting after Chapter 167J the following new chapter:-
Chapter 167K Regulation of Virtual Currency Kiosks
Section 1. As used in this chapter, the following words shall, unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Person”, an individual, firm, fiduciary, partnership, corporation, trust or association,
however formed, or a club, trustee, agency or receiver.
"Virtual currency kiosk", an electronic terminal acting as a mechanical agent of the
virtual currency kiosk operator to enable the virtual currency kiosk operator to facilitate the
exchange of virtual currency for money, bank credit, or other virtual currency, including but not
limited to by (1) connecting directly to a separate “virtual currency exchange" that performs the
of 3

actual virtual currency transmission, or (2) drawing upon the virtual currency in the possession
of the electronic terminal's operator.
“Virtual-currency kiosk operator", a person or entity that engages in virtual-currency
business activity via a money transmission kiosk located in the commonwealth or a person or
entity that owns, operates, or manages a money transmission kiosk located in the commonwealth
through which virtual-currency business activity is offered.
Section 2. (a) A virtual currency kiosk operator may not operate a virtual currency kiosk
in the commonwealth of Massachusetts.
(b) A violation of subsection (a) is deemed to be in violation of section 2 of Chapter 93A
of the general laws.
(c) The attorney general is hereby granted the authority to bring action under subsection
(b) pursuant to Chapter 93A against the following:
(1) The virtual currency kiosk operator
(2) The owner of the premises on which the virtual currency kiosk is located, if the owner
knowingly or intentionally permitted the virtual currency kiosk to be on the premises.
(d) If a court finds that a person has knowingly or intentionally operated 1 or more virtual
currency kiosks in the commonwealth in violation of this chapter, the court may, in addition to
any other penalty imposed under Chapter 93A, order the following:
(1) That the person forfeit the amount of any charges that were collected by the person
from users of the virtual currency kiosks or kiosks during the period in which the person
operated the virtual currency kiosk of kiosks in violation of this chapter.
of 3

(2) That the person forfeit any virtual currency kiosk that is owned by the person and
located in the commonwealth.
(3) That the person pay to the attorney general all costs associated with the investigation
of the violation.
Section 4. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 3